Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1204.02
Confiscation of firearm; disposition.

Any firearm in the possession of a person in violation of section 28-1204 or 28-1204.01 shall be confiscated by a peace officer or other authorized law enforcement officer. Such firearm shall be held by the agency employing such officer until it no longer is required as evidence.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 3.

Disposition of confiscated firearm, see section 28-1204.04.